Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.01.050

The general law.

For the purposes of this optional municipal code, "the general law" means any provision of state law, not inconsistent with this title, enacted before or after the enactment of this title, which is by its terms applicable or available to all cities or towns. Except when expressly provided to the contrary, whenever in this optional municipal code reference is made to "the general law", or to specific provisions of the Revised Code of Washington, it shall mean "the general law, or such specific provisions of the Revised Code of Washington as now enacted or as the same may hereafter be amended".

[ 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.01.050.]